Missouri, session 2026, HB2861.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.506, to read as follows:
9.506. July sixteenth each year is hereby designated as "Atomic Veterans Day"
2 in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
3 events and activities to recognize the unique contributions of veterans who were on
4 active duty and exposed to ionizing radiation during nuclear testing operations, part of
5 the military occupation forces in and around Hiroshima or Nagasaki before 1946, or
6 held as prisoners of war in or around Hiroshima or Nagasaki.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.